Nebraska, session 109, LB281.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB281 LB281
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 38-167, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
38-167 (1) Boards shall be designated as follows:
(a) Board of Advanced Practice Registered Nurses;
(a) (b) Board of Alcohol and Drug Counseling;
(b) (c) Board of Athletic Training;
(c) (d) Board of Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology;
(d) (e) Board of Behavior Analysts;
(e) (f) Board of Chiropractic;
(f) (g) Board of Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail
Technology, and Body Art;
(g) (h) Board of Dentistry;
(h) (i) Board of Emergency Medical Services;
(i) (j) Board of Registered Environmental Health Specialists;
(j) (k) Board of Funeral Directing and Embalming;
(k) (l) Board of Hearing Instrument Specialists;
(l) (m) Board of Massage Therapy;
(m) (n) Board of Medical Nutrition Therapy;
(n) (o) Board of Medical Radiography;
(o) (p) Board of Medicine and Surgery;
(p) (q) Board of Mental Health Practice;
(q) (r) Board of Nursing;
(r) (s) Board of Nursing Home Administration;
(s) (t) Board of Occupational Therapy Practice;
(t) (u) Board of Optometry;
(u) (v) Board of Pharmacy;
(v) (w) Board of Physical Therapy;
(w) (x) Board of Podiatry;
(x) (y) Board of Psychology;
(y) (z) Board of Respiratory Care Practice; and
(z) (aa) Board of Veterinary Medicine and Surgery.
-2-

LB281 LB281
2025 2025
(2) Any change made by the Legislature of the names of boards listed
in this section shall not change the membership of such boards or affect
the validity of any action taken by or the status of any action pending
before any of such boards. Any such board newly named by the Legislature
shall be the direct and only successor to the board as previously named.
Sec. 2. Section 38-204, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-204 Board means the Board of Nursing Advanced Practice Registered
Nurses.
Sec. 3. Section 38-605, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-605 Board means the Board of Nursing Advanced Practice Registered
Nurses.
Sec. 4. Section 38-703, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-703 Board means the Board of Nursing Advanced Practice Registered
Nurses.
Sec. 5. Section 38-904, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-904 Board means the Board of Nursing Advanced Practice Registered
Nurses.
Sec. 6. Section 38-2213, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-2213 (1) The board shall consist of eight registered nurse
members, two licensed practical nurse members, and three two public
members. The registered nurses on the board shall be from the following
areas: (a) One practical nurse educator; (b) one associate degree or
diploma nurse educator; (c) one baccalaureate nurse educator; (d) two
nursing service administrators; (e) two staff nurses; and (f) four one
advanced practice registered nurses nurse.
(2) The State Board of Health shall attempt to ensure that the
-3-

LB281 LB281
2025 2025
membership of the Board of Nursing is representative of acute care, long-
term care, and community-based care. A minimum of three and a maximum of
five members shall be appointed from each congressional district, and
each member shall have been a bona fide resident of the congressional
district from which he or she is appointed for a period of at least one
year prior to the time of the appointment of such member.
Sec. 7. Section 38-2214, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-2214 (1) Each licensed practical nurse educator on the board
shall (a) be a registered nurse currently licensed in the state, (b) have
graduated with a graduate degree in nursing or a related field of study,
(c) have had a minimum of five years' experience in administration,
teaching, or consultation in practical nurse education, and (d) be
currently employed as a practical nurse educator.
(2) Each associate degree or diploma nurse educator on the board and
the baccalaureate nurse educator on the board shall (a) be a registered
nurse currently licensed in the state, (b) have graduated with a graduate
degree in nursing, (c) have had a minimum of five years' experience in
administration, teaching, or consultation in nursing education, and (d)
be currently employed in the field being represented.
(3) Each staff nurse on the board shall (a) be a registered nurse
currently licensed in the state, (b) have had a minimum of five years'
experience in nursing, and (c) be currently employed as a staff nurse in
the provision of patient care services.
(4) Each nursing service administrator on the board shall (a) be a
registered nurse currently licensed in the state, (b) have had a minimum
of five years' experience in nursing service administration, and (c) be
currently employed in such field.
(5) Each licensed practical nurse member shall (a) have completed at
least four years of high school study, (b) be licensed as a licensed
practical nurse in this state, (c) have obtained a certificate or diploma
-4-

LB281 LB281
2025 2025
from a state-approved practical nursing program, (d) have been actively
engaged in practical nursing for at least five years, and (e) be
currently employed in the provision of patient care services as a
licensed practical nurse in the state.
(6) Each public member shall meet the requirements of section
38-165.
(7) Each The advanced practice registered nurse on the board shall
(a) have a minimum of five years' experience as an advanced practice
registered nurse, (b) be currently employed as an advanced practice
registered nurse, and (c) be licensed as an advanced practice registered
nurse.
(8) On and after January 1, 2026, the terms for advanced practice
registered nurses serving on the board shall be as follows: One shall be
appointed for a three-year term, one shall be appointed for a four-year
term, and one shall be appointed for a five-year term. All subsequent
appointments shall be for five-year terms.
(9) The preferred representation of the advanced practice registered
nurses on the board shall be as follows: (a) One certified registered
nurse anesthetist, (b) one nurse practitioner, (c) one clinical nurse
specialist and (d) one certified nurse midwife. If such representation is
not possible, the vacancies may be filled based on the composition of the
applicant pool.
(8) Members serving on December 1, 2008, may complete their
respective terms even if they do not meet the requirements for
appointment as changed by Laws 2007, LB 463.
Sec. 8. Section 38-2216, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
38-2216 In addition to the duties listed in sections 38-126 and
38-161, the board shall:
(1) Adopt reasonable and uniform standards for nursing practice and
nursing education;
-5-

LB281 LB281
2025 2025
(2) If requested, issue or decline to issue advisory opinions
defining acts which in the opinion of the board are or are not permitted
in the practice of nursing. Such opinions shall be considered
informational only and are nonbinding. Practice-related information
provided by the board to registered nurses or licensed practical nurses
licensed under the Nurse Practice Act shall be made available by the
board on request to nurses practicing in this state under a license
issued by a state that is a party to the Nurse Licensure Compact;
(3) Establish rules and regulations for approving and classifying
programs preparing nurses, taking into consideration administrative and
organizational patterns, the curriculum, students, student services,
faculty, and instructional resources and facilities, and provide surveys
for each educational program as determined by the board;
(4) Approve educational programs which meet the requirements of the
Nurse Practice Act;
(5) Keep a record of all its proceedings and compile an annual
report for distribution;
(6) Adopt rules and regulations establishing standards for
delegation of nursing activities, including training or experience
requirements, competency determination, and nursing supervision;
(7) Collect data regarding nursing;
(8) Provide consultation and conduct conferences, forums, studies,
and research on nursing practice and education;
(9) Join organizations that develop and regulate the national
nursing licensure examinations and exclusively promote the improvement of
the legal standards of the practice of nursing for the protection of the
public health, safety, and welfare; and
(10) Administer the Nurse Licensure Compact. In reporting
information to the coordinated licensure information system under Article
VII of the compact, the department may disclose personal identifying
information about a nurse, including his or her social security number; .
-6-

LB281 LB281
2025 2025
(11) Establish standards for integrated practice agreements between
collaborating physicians and certified nurse midwives;
(12) Monitor the scope of practice by certified nurse midwives,
certified registered nurse anesthetists, clinical nurse specialists, and
nurse practitioners;
(13) Recommend disciplinary action relating to licenses of advanced
practice registered nurses, certified nurse midwives, certified
registered nurse anesthetists, clinical nurse specialists, and nurse
practitioners;
(14) Engage in other activities not inconsistent with the Advanced
Practice Registered Nurse Practice Act, the Certified Nurse Midwifery
Practice Act, the Certified Registered Nurse Anesthetist Practice Act,
the Clinical Nurse Specialist Practice Act, and the Nurse Practitioner
Practice Act; and
(15) Adopt rules and regulations to implement the Advanced Practice
Registered Nurse Practice Act, the Certified Nurse Midwifery Practice
Act, the Certified Registered Nurse Anesthetist Practice Act, the
Clinical Nurse Specialist Practice Act, and the Nurse Practitioner
Practice Act, for promulgation by the department as provided in section
38-126. Such rules and regulations shall also include (a) approved
certification organizations and certification programs and (b)
professional liability insurance.
Sec. 9. Section 38-2306, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-2306 Board means the Board of Nursing Advanced Practice
Registered Nurses.
Sec. 10. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2026.
Sec. 11. Original sections 38-204, 38-605, 38-703, 38-904, 38-2213,
38-2214, and 38-2306, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections
38-167 and 38-2216, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are
repealed.
-7-

LB281 LB281
2025 2025
Sec. 12. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections
38-205, 38-206, and 38-2307, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
-8-